src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
 PSS_PRSPRC_dAv ;
 PSS_PRFPRC_d ; !!= * @CODE@
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

 Harm_Neutr_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE-PSS_IND_PRT_di ; !!= * @CODE@ only 3rd person
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:
! PSS_PRSPRC, PSS-PRFPRC, ACT_PRSPRC, INF_mA, ACT-PRFPRC-OBL,
! ACT_PRSPRC
 ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;
 Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
 ACT-PRFPRC-OBL_nU ;
 ACT_IND_PRS-SG1_ZERO ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_dEq ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_dEq ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL2_tiq ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;

LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NOT-RAISED-VOWEL !!= * @CODE@ joo- söö-
! Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom, Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3, Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1, Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3
 ACT-PRFPRC_nUq-SG_NOM ; !!= * @CODE@ joonuq
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_sE ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;
 ACT-COND ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ; 

LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE !!= * @CODE@ juvv
 Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ; !!= * @CODE@ juvvaq süvväq
:%>%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_JUVVA_PSS_IND_PRS ; !!= * @CODE@ juvva süvvä
:%>i Harm_Neutr_JUVVA_PSS_IND_PRT_1/2 ; !!= * @CODE@ juvvi süvvi
:%>%{aä%} PSS_IND_CONNEGII ;

LEXICON V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE !!= * @CODE@ jõi-
 ACT_IND_PRT-1/2_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRT_12_E ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_E ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;
+Err/Dial:%>%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;

LEXICON V_77KAEUEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** käümä:käü
!! * Yaml: **sueuemae**
:%{front%} V_77XX/KAEUEMAE ;

LEXICON V_77XX/KAEUEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** käümä:käü
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

:%^VOWRaise V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) käü
! PSS_PRSPRC, PSS-PRFPRC, ACT_PRSPRC, INF_mA

 V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NOT-RAISED-VOWEL ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) käü-
!

:%^VowRM%>vv V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) kävv
!

:%^VowRM%>ve V_77JUUMA/SUEUEMAE_NON-RAISED-VOWEL-TENSE ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) käve
!

 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) RAISED käü
! Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3

 ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) käüväq



LEXICON V_78VWIMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** võima:või
!! * Yaml: **V-vwima**
:%{back%} V_VWIMA/XX ;
LEXICON V_VWIMA/XX !!≈ * **@CODE@** võima:või
! (1) I tegonimi:
 Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
:%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_dAq ;
 ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;

! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
 PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;
PSS_IND_CONNEGII ;
+Err/Orth: PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

 ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;

 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
 
:%>s%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT-1/2_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:%>ds%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT-1/2_ZERO ;
:%>s%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
:%>s%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;
+Err/Dial:%>ds%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Dial:%>ds%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;



LEXICON V_78SAAMA
!! * Yaml: **saama**
:%{back%} V_78SAAMA/XX ;
LEXICON V_78SAAMA/XX
! (1) I tegonimi:
 Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
:%^VowRM%>i%{aä%} Harm_Neutr_JUVVA_PSS_IND_PRS ;
 PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_di/SG3_ti ;
 PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
 PSS_PRFPRC_d ;
+Err/Dial: PSS_PRFPRC_dU-SG_NOM ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

 ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;

+Err/Dial: Harm_Neutr_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iE ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRT_12_iE ;

 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

 ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;
+Err/Dial: ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_iE ;
:%^VowRM%>i ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;
+Err/Dial:%^VowRM%>i%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;
ACT-COND ;

 Harm_Neutr_INF_iAq ;
 ACT_PRSPRC_vA ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
 ACT_JUS_guq ;

LEXICON V_78VIIMAE !viimä:v%{ei%}%{ei%}
!! * Yaml: __V-viimae__
:%{front%}  V_78XX/VIIMAE ; 

LEXICON V_78XX/VIIMAE
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
:%^VOWRaise Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) tettäv tm passiiv:
:%^VOWRaise PSS_IND_PRT_ALL_di ;
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:
 
 ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_sE ;
 ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;
 PSS_IND_SG1_dX/SG3_tX ;

 Harm_Neutr_IND-PRT-SCSG1_iE ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
 ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ;
 ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_iE ;

 Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
 Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
 PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:%^WGStem PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;


LEXICON V_78MINEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** minemä:min
!! * Yaml: **V-minemae**
:%{front%} V_XX/MINEMAE ;
LEXICON V_XX/MINEMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** minemä:min
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
:min PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;
:min PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Orth:min PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

:min%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
+Inf:min%>n%{aä%}q K ;

:minn%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v ;
:min ACT_JUS_kuq ;
!! Remainder is in exceptions.lexc
!! minemä **to go/ mennä**
+Pss+Ind+Prt+Sg3:minti K ;
:%{front%}län ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%{front%}lää K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%{front%}läät K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%{front%}läädeq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%{front%}lätt K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%{front%}läämiq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%{front%}läätiq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%{front%}lääväq K ;
+Use/NG+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%{front%}lätväq K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg:%{front%}lää%-äiq K ;
+Act+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+Prs+Neg:%{front%}lää%-äi K ;
+Act+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+Prs+Neg:%{front%}lää%-iq K ;
+Act+Err/Orth-no-q+Ind+Prs+Neg:%{front%}lää%-i K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Neg:%{front%}lää%-äs K ;
+Act+Ind+ConNegII:%{front%}lää K ;
:%{front%}lätsi TULWMA_ACT_IND_PRT_ZERO_and_X ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%{front%}lätś K ;



LEXICON V_79TULWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** tulõma:tul
!! * Yaml: **tulwma**
:%{back%} V_79TULWMA/XX ;
LEXICON V_79TULWMA/XX !!≈ * **@CODE@** tulõma:tul

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
! (1) I tegonimi:
:%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;

! (2) II tegonimi:
:l Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) tullaq
:l%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ; !!= * @CODE@ (2b) tullõv
!! Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom
:%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_OBL_v ;

! (3) tulnuq tm aktiiv:
 ACT_PRFPRC_ALL_nUq ;

! (4) tult tm passiiv:
PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ; ! tult, tuldu
 PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ; ! tulda, tuldas
:d%{aä%} PSS-COND ;

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq: (1. and Neg, ConNegs.)
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG/PRS_SG1 ; !tulõ
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;

:%{eõ%} ACT-COND ;

! 2nd person indicative present
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG2_t/dEq/PL2_tiq ;

! 1st person plural present
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_PL1_miq ;

! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ;

! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
:l%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO/PL3_q ;

! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
:l%>i ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_q/dEq/PL1_miq/PL2_tiq ;

! (8) min 3. k tä:
:%{lĺ%}%^PAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
+Err/Orth-no-pal:%{lĺ%}%^NoPAL ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_ZERO ;
! (9) jus:
 ACT_JUS_guq ;

LEXICON V_79PURWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** purõma:pur
!! * Yaml: **purwma**
:%{back%} V_79PURWMA/XX ;
LEXICON V_79PURWMA/XX !!≈ * **@CODE@** purõma:pur
! (1) I tegonimi:
! (2) II tegonimi:
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
!! Retain consonant 
 Harm_Neutr_LUGWMA_PSS-PRC ; !!= * @CODE@ (4) pur
!! Pss+PrfPrc, Pss+PrsPrc, 

! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v_LUGWMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (1) purõma
!! +Act+PrsPrc+Sg OBL, Inf/mA, 
 ACT_JUS_guq ;
!! +Jus, 

!! Strengthen consonant
:%^StrGStem Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ; !!= * @CODE@ (2) purraq
!! Inf 
!! Strengthen consonant 
:%^StrGStem%>%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ; !!= * @CODE@ (2b) purrõv
!! Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
 Harm_Neutr_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGWMA ; !!= * @CODE@ (3) purnuq
!! +Act+PrfPrc


!! Retain consonant and add õ
:%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_LUGWMA_IND-CONNEGII ; !!= * @CODE@ (5) purõ
!! Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1/Sg2/Pl1/Pl2, Ind+ConNegII, Ind+Prs+ConNeg
!! Pss+Ind

!! Retain consonant and stem vowel
:%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS_SG3_ZERO/PL3_vAq ; !!= * @CODE@ (6) purõma
!! Ind+Prs+ 3

!! Strengthen consonant and replace stem vowel with i
:%>i TULWMA_ACT_IND_PRT_ZERO_and_X ; !!= * @CODE@ (7) puri
!! Act+Ind+PrtSg1/Sg2/Pl1-3

!! consonant and add i
ACT_IND_PRT_SG3_i ; !!= * @CODE@ (8)1 puri
!! Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3

LEXICON V_79OLWMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** olõma:o
:%{back%} V_79OLWMA/XX ;

LEXICON V_79OLWMA/XX !!≈ * **@CODE@** olõma:o
! (1) I tegonimi:
:l%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_INF_mA ;
! (2) II tegonimi:
:ll Harm_Neutr_INF_Aq ;
:ll GER_INE ;
! (3) tekev tm aktiiv:
! (4) Tettäv tm passiiv:
! (5) Olõvao 1. k maq:
! 2nd person indicative present
! 1st person plural present
! (6) Olõvao 3. k tä:
! (7) min 1. k maq: Sg1 and Pl3
! (7.2) Sg2, Pl1 and Pl2
! (8) min 3. k tä:
! (9) jus:

:l%{eõ%} ACT_IND_PRS-12 ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:m K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:mm%{aä%}q K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3+Err/Orth-no-q:mm%{aä%} K ;
+Err/Dial:mm%{aä%} ACT_IND_PRS_PL3_vAq ;
:l PSS_IND_PRS_ALL_dA ;

:lli ACT_IND_PRT_SG1_ZERO ;
!2023_02_19:ll ACT_IND_PRT_12_i ;
:lli ACT_IND_PRT_PL1_miq ;
:lli ACT_IND_PRT_PL2_tiq ;
:ll ACT_IND_PRT_SG2_iq ;
:l%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEG ;
:l%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:lĺ K ;
+Err/Dial+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:lle K ;
:lli ACT_IND_PRT_PL3_q/vAq ;
:l PSS_IND_PRT_SG1_di/SG3_ti ;

:ll%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_SG_NOM_v ;
:l%{eõ%} Harm_Neutr_ACT_PRSPRC_v_LUGWMA ;
:l%{eõ%} ACT_JUS_guq ;
:l Harm_Neutr_ACT-PRFPRC_v_LUGWMA ;
:l PSS_PRSPRC_tAv ;
:l PSS_PRFPRC_t/SG_GEN_dU ;
+Err/Dial:l PSS_PRFPRC_tU_SG_NOM ;
:l%{eõ%} ACT_IND_CONNEGII ;
:lda PSS_IND_CONNEGII ;
:lda PSS_IND_CONNEG ;

LEXICON V_80RAPAHUTMA !!≈ * **@CODE@** rapahutma:rapahuta
:%{back%} V_80RAPAHUTMA/HAEMMAEHUETMAE ;
LEXICON V_80HAEMMAEHUETMAE !!≈ * **@CODE@** hämmähütmä:hämmähütä
:%{front%} V_80RAPAHUTMA/HAEMMAEHUETMAE ;
!WHATISTHIS
